Maryland, session 2025, HB1410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–203.
[(b) (1) In this subsection, “first–time Maryland home buyer” means an
individual who has never owned in the State residential real property that has been the
individual’s principal residence.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1410*

HOUSE BILL 1410
(2) If there are two or more grantees, this subsection does not apply unless
each grantee is a first–time Maryland home buyer or a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property and the co–maker or guarantor will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for a sale of improved
residential real property to a first–time Maryland home buyer who will occupy the property
as a principal residence, the rate of the transfer tax is 0.25% of the consideration payable
for the instrument of writing and the transfer tax shall be paid entirely by the seller.
(4) To qualify for the exemption under paragraph (3) of this subsection,
each grantee or an agent of the grantee shall provide a statement that is signed under oath
by the grantee or agent of the grantee stating that:
(i) 1. the grantee is an individual who has never owned in the
State residential real property that has been the individual’s principal residence; and
2. the residence will be occupied by the grantee as the
grantee’s principal residence; or
(ii) 1. the grantee is a co–maker or guarantor of a purchase
money mortgage or purchase money deed of trust as defined in § 12–108(i) of this article
for the property; and
2. the grantee will not occupy the residence as the
co–maker’s or guarantor’s principal residence.
(5) A statement under paragraph (4) of this subsection by an agent of a
grantee shall state that the statement:
(i) is based on a diligent inquiry made by the agent with respect to
the facts set forth in the statement; and
(ii) is true to the best of the knowledge, information, and belief of the
agent.]
13–207.
(D) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER”
MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NEVER OWNED IN THE STATE RESIDENTIAL REAL
PROPERTY THAT HAS BEEN THE INDIVIDUAL’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
(2) IF THERE ARE TWO OR MORE GRANTEES, THIS SUBSECTION DOES
NOT APPLY UNLESS EACH GRANTEE IS A FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER OR A
CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR OF A PURCHASE MONEY MORTGAGE OR PURCHASE

HOUSE BILL 1410 3
MONEY DEED OF TRUST AS DEFINED IN § 12–108(I) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR THE
PROPERTY AND THE CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR WILL NOT OCCUPY THE RESIDENCE
AS THE CO–MAKER’S OR GUARANTOR’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
(3) AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING THAT TRANSFERS IMPROVED
RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY TO A FIRST–TIME MARYLAND HOME BUYER WHO
WILL OCCUPY THE PROPERTY AS A PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE IS NOT SUBJECT TO THE
TRANSFER TAX.
(4) TO QUALIFY FOR THE EXEMPTION UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, EACH GRANTEE OR AN AGENT OF THE GRANTEE SHALL PROVIDE A
STATEMENT THAT IS SIGNED UNDER OATH BY THE GRANTEE OR AGENT OF THE
GRANTEE STATING THAT:
(I) 1. THE GRANTEE IS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS NEVER
OWNED IN THE STATE RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY THAT HAS BEEN THE
INDIVIDUAL’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; AND
2. THE RESIDENCE WILL BE OCCUPIED BY THE GRANTEE
AS THE GRANTEE’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE; OR
(II) 1. THE GRANTEE IS A CO–MAKER OR GUARANTOR OF A
PURCHASE MONEY MORTGAGE OR PURCHASE MONEY DEED OF TRUST AS DEFINED
IN § 12–108(I) OF THIS ARTICLE FOR THE PROPERTY; AND
2. THE GRANTEE WILL NOT OCCUPY THE RESIDENCE AS
THE CO–MAKER’S OR GUARANTOR’S PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE.
(5) A STATEMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY AN
AGENT OF A GRANTEE SHALL STATE THAT THE STATEMENT:
(I) IS BASED ON A DILIGENT INQUIRY MADE BY THE AGENT
WITH RESPECT TO THE FACTS SET FORTH IN THE STATEMENT; AND
(II) IS TRUE TO THE BEST OF THE KNOWLEDGE, INFORMATION,
AND BELIEF OF THE AGENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.